District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.50

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Derivative proceeding” means a civil action in the right of a domestic corporation or, to the extent provided in § 29-305.57, in the right of a foreign corporation.

(2)

“Shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or held by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720